California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 positions for the Medi-Cal program at the department. The department shall consult with the Department of Human Resources in developing this aspect of the transition plan.

(4) A list of any planned or proposed changes or efficiencies in how the functions will be performed, including the anticipated fiscal and programmatic impacts of the changes.

(5) A detailed organization chart that reflects the planned staffing at the department, taking into account the requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, and includes focused, high-level leadership for behavioral health issues.

(6) A description of how stakeholders were included in the initial planning process to formulate the transition plan, and a description of how their feedback will be taken into consideration after transition activities are underway.

(b) The department, together with the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs, shall convene and consult with stakeholders at least once following production of a draft of the transition plan and before submission of that plan to the Legislature. Continued consultation with stakeholders shall occur in accordance with the requirement in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 903, Sec. 22.   (SB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.33.

A regulation or order concerning the Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program adopted by the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs pursuant to former Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 11758.40) of Part 1 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, as in effect preceding the effective date of the act that added this section, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable, unless and until the readoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation or
 order by the department, or until it expires by its own terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 36, Sec. 74.   (SB 1014)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.35.

(a) The department shall prepare and submit amendments to the Medicaid state plan and apply for any necessary waivers in order to obtain federal financial participation to implement Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program provisions contained in Section 14124.24.

(b) Upon federal approval for federal financial assistance,
 the department, in consultation with the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs, shall define the Drug Medi-Cal services, as needed, shall establish the standards under which those services qualify as Drug Medi-Cal reimbursable services, and shall develop appropriate rates of reimbursement for those services, subject to utilization controls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 36, Sec. 75.   (SB 1014)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.4.

(a) California’s plan for federal Medi-Cal grants for medical assistance programs, pursuant to Subchapter XIX (commencing with Section 1396) of Title 42 of the United States Code, shall accomplish the following objectives:

(1) Expansion of the location and type of therapeutic services offered to persons with mental illnesses under Medi-Cal
 by the category of “other diagnostic, screening, preventative, and rehabilitative services” that is available to states under the federal Social Security Act and its implementing regulations (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(a)(13); 42 C.F.R. 440.130).

(2) Expansion of federal financial participation in the costs of specialty mental health services provided by local mental health plans or under contract with the mental health plans.

(3) Expansion of the location where reimbursable specialty mental health services can be provided, including home, school, and community-based sites.

(4) Expansion of federal financial participation for services that meet the rehabilitation needs of persons with mental illnesses, including, but not limited to, medication management, functional rehabilitation assessments of clients, and rehabilitative
 services that include remedial services directed at restoration to the highest possible functional level for persons with mental illnesses and maximum reduction of symptoms of mental illness.

(5) Improvement of fiscal systems and accountability structures for specialty mental health services, costs, and rates, with the goal of achieving federal fiscal requirements.

(b) The department’s state plan revision shall be completed with review and comments by the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California and other appropriate groups.

(c) Services under the rehabilitative option shall be limited to specialty mental health plans certified to provide Medi-Cal under this option.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the rehabilitation
 option of the state Medicaid plan be implemented to expand and provide flexibility to treatment services and to increase the federal participation without increasing the costs to the General Fund.

(e) The department shall review and revise the quality assurance standards and guidelines required by Section 14725 to ensure that quality services are delivered to the eligible population. Any reviews shall include, but not be limited to, appropriate use of mental health professionals, including psychiatrists, in the treatment and rehabilitation of clients under this model. The existing quality assurance standards and guidelines shall remain in effect until the adoption of the new quality assurance standards and guidelines.

(f) Consistent with services offered to persons with mental illnesses under the Medi-Cal program, as required by this section, it is the intent of the Legislature
 for the department to include care and treatment of persons with mental illnesses who are eligible for the Medi-Cal program in facilities with a bed capacity of 16 beds or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 51.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rates for reimbursing specialty mental health and substance use disorder services allowable under the Medi-Cal program and rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall continue to be based on the upper limits allowable under federal law and regulations for services provided prior to July 1, 1980, on the lower of reasonable cost and
 customary charges for services provided July 1, 1980, through June 30, 1982, and on the lowest of reasonable cost, customary charges, and rates paid by the Medi-Cal program for services provided July 1, 1982, through June 30, 1984.

(b) The Legislature hereby states and declares that this section does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law and that rates for reimbursing specialty mental health and substance use disorder services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries under the Medi-Cal program in previous fiscal years were based upon the lower of reasonable costs or customary charges.

(c) The department shall promulgate emergency regulations relating to claims submission and establishing rates and a ratesetting methodology for determining reimbursement of specialty mental health and substance use disorder services allowable under the Medi-Cal program and rendered to
 Medi-Cal beneficiaries. The methodology and rates shall reflect the most recently completed cost reports and shall be effective commencing July 1, 1984.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, rates for reimbursing specialty mental health services allowable under the Medi-Cal program and rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall be effective from July 1 through June 30 of the fiscal year in which these rates are established.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, rates for reimbursing substance use disorder services allowable under the Medi-Cal program and rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall be effective from July 1 through June 30 of the fiscal year in which these rates are established.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 224.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.51.

(a) For purposes of this section, “narcotic treatment program services” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Admission, physical evaluation, and diagnosis.

(2) Drug screening.

(3) Pregnancy tests.

(4) Narcotic replacement therapy dosing.

(5) Any medication approved under Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 355), and all biological products licensed under Section 351 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 262) to treat opioid use disorders.

(6) (A) Intake assessment, treatment planning, and counseling services.

(B) The frequency of counseling, behavioral therapy, or medical
 psychotherapy, outcomes, and rates shall be addressed through guidance issued by the department pursuant to subdivision (k). For purposes of this paragraph, these services include substance use services to pregnant and postpartum Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(b) (1) The department shall establish a narcotic replacement therapy dosing fee for methadone.

(2) In addition to the narcotic replacement therapy dosing fee specified in paragraph (1), a narcotic treatment program shall be reimbursed for the ingredient costs of methadone dispensed to a Medi-Cal beneficiary. These costs may be determined on an average daily dose of methadone, as set forth by the department.

(c) Reimbursement for narcotic treatment program services shall be based on a per capita uniform statewide daily reimbursement rate for each individual patient, as established by the department. The uniform statewide daily reimbursement rate for narcotic treatment program services shall be based upon, if available and appropriate, all of the following:

(1) The outpatient rates for the same or similar services under the fee-for-service Medi-Cal program.

(2) Cost report data.

(3) Other data deemed reliable and relevant by the department.

(4) The rate studies completed pursuant to Section 54 of Chapter 197 of the Statutes of 1996.

(d) The uniform statewide daily reimbursement rate for ancillary services shall not exceed, for individual services or in the aggregate, the outpatient rates for the same or similar services under
 the fee-for-service Medi-Cal program.

(e) The uniform statewide daily reimbursement rate shall be established after consultation with narcotic treatment program providers and county alcohol and drug program administrators.

(f) Reimbursement for narcotic treatment program services shall be limited to those services specified in state law and any authorized federally approved Medicaid state plan amendments or waivers related to the Drug Medi-Cal program, and shall be provided in accordance with federal and state law governing the licensing and administration of narcotic treatment programs.

(g) Reimbursement under this section shall be limited to claims for narcotic treatment program services at the uniform statewide daily reimbursement rate for these services. These rates shall be exempt from the requirements of Section 14021.6.

(h) (1) Reimbursement to a narcotic treatment program provider shall be limited to the lower of the uniform statewide daily reimbursement rate, pursuant to subdivision (c), or the provider’s usual and customary charge to the general public for the same or similar service.

(2) (A) Reimbursement paid by a county to a narcotic treatment program provider for services provided to any person subject to Section 1210.1 or 3063.1 of the Penal Code, and for which the individual client is not liable to pay, is not a usual and customary charge to the general public for the purposes of this section.

(B) Subparagraph (A) is not a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(i) A program shall not be reimbursed for services or medications not rendered to or received by a patient of a narcotic treatment program.

(j) Reimbursement for narcotic treatment program services shall be administered by the department and any county electing to participate in the program. Utilization and payment for these services shall be subject to federal Medicaid and state utilization and audit requirements.

(k) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of bulletins or similar instructions, until the time that any necessary regulations are adopted.

(l) The department shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section by July 1, 2023.

(m) This section shall be implemented to the extent that any necessary federal approval of state plan amendments or other federal approvals, including waivers, are obtained, and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 50.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.52.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) Medical treatment for indigent patients who are not eligible for Medi-Cal is essential to protecting the public health.

(B) The Legislature supports the adoption of standardized and simplified forms and procedures in
 order to promote the drug treatment of indigent patients who are not eligible for Medi-Cal.

(C) Providers should not be required by the state to subsidize the medical treatment provided to indigent patients who are not eligible for Medi-Cal.

(D) The Legislature supports the therapeutic value of indigent patients who are not eligible for Medi-Cal contributing some level of fees for drug treatment services in order to support the goals of those drug treatment services.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to encourage narcotic treatment program providers to serve indigent patients who are not eligible for Medi-Cal. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the department allow narcotic treatment program providers to charge therapeutic fees for providing drug treatment to indigent
 patients who are not eligible for Medi-Cal if the providers establish a fee scale that complies with the documentation requirements established pursuant to this section and federal law.

(b) (1) The Legislature recognizes that narcotic treatment program providers are reimbursed for controlled substances provided under the Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program, also known as Drug Medi-Cal, and pursuant to federal law at a rate that is the lower of the per capita uniform statewide daily reimbursement or Drug Medi-Cal rate, or the provider’s usual and customary charge to the general public for the same or similar services.

(2) It furthers the intent of the Legislature to ensure that narcotic treatment programs in the state are able to serve indigent clients and that there is an exception to the reimbursement requirements described in paragraph (1), as the federal law
 has been interpreted by representatives with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. Pursuant to this exception, if a narcotic treatment program provider that is serving low-income non-Drug Medi-Cal clients complies with a federal requirement for the application of a sliding indigency scale, the reduced charges under the sliding indigency scale shall not lower the provider’s usual and customary charge determination for purposes of Medi-Cal reimbursement.

(c) A licensed narcotic treatment program provider that serves low-income non-Drug Medi-Cal clients shall be deemed in compliance with federal and state law, for purposes of the application of the exception described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and avoid audit disallowances, if the provider implements a sliding indigency scale that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The maximum fee contained in
 the scale shall be the provider’s full nondiscounted, published charge and shall be at least the rate that Drug Medi-Cal would pay for the same or similar services provided to Drug Medi-Cal clients.

(2) The sliding indigency scale shall provide for an array of different charges, based upon a client’s ability to pay, as measured by identifiable variables. These variables may include, but need not be limited to, financial information and the number of dependents of the client.

(3) Income ranges shall be in increments that result in a reasonable distribution of clients paying differing amounts for services based on differing abilities to pay.

(4) A provider shall obtain written documentation that supports an indigency allowance under the sliding indigency scale established pursuant to this section, including a financial
 determination. In cases where this written documentation cannot be obtained, the provider shall document at least three attempts to obtain this written documentation from a client.

(5) The provider shall maintain all written documentation that supports an indigency allowance under this section, including, if used, the financial evaluation form set forth in Section 14021.53.

(6) Written policies shall be established and maintained that set forth the basis for determining whether an indigency allowance may be granted under this section and establish what documentation shall be requested from a client.

(d) In developing the sliding indigency scale, a narcotic treatment program provider shall consider, but need not include, any or all of the following components:

(1) Vertically, the rows would reflect increments of family or household income. There would be a sufficient number of increments to allow for differing charges, such as a six hundred dollar ($600) increase per interval.

(2) Horizontally, the columns would provide for some other variable, such as family size, in which case, the columns would reflect the number of people dependent on the income, including the client.

(3) Each row, except the first and last rows, would contain at least two different fee amounts and each of the columns, four or more in number, would contain at least six different fee amounts.

(4) The cells would contain an array of fees so that no fee would be represented in more than 25 percent of the cells.

(e) A narcotic
 treatment program provider that uses the financial evaluation form instructions and financial form set forth in Section 14021.53 in obtaining written documentation that supports an indigency allowance as required under paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) shall be deemed in compliance with that paragraph.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 36, Sec. 77.   (SB 1014)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.53.

A narcotic treatment program provider may use the following instructions and financial evaluation form to comply with the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 14021.52:
FINANCIAL EVALUATION FORM INSTRUCTIONS
MONTHLY INCOME DATA—This data should specify the
 source and the amount and be supported by sufficient documentation. Income data may include, but are not limited to, income received as a paid employee, unemployment benefits, disability benefits, pension payments, family income, savings income, or other sources.

MONTHLY EXPENSES DATA—This data is not required unless there is no evidence or documentation of income data. Expense data may include, but are not limited to, any known expenses related to the following:

(1) Court-ordered payments, such as child support, fines, debts, restitution, or other payments.

(2) Housing-related expenses, such as rent, mortgage, insurance, utilities, or other obligations.

(3) Transportation costs, such as any related expenses, including automobile payments or automobile insurance
 payments.

(4) Insurance coverage should also be noted if it produces either an expense or benefit to the client.

CLIENT MONTHLY TREATMENT FEE—The following applies to this data:

(1) The amount box indicates the client’s fee according to his or her location on the sliding scale.

(2) The adjusted client monthly fee box is to be filled only if the fee to be charged differs from the fee indicated by the client’s location on the sliding scale.

(3) If the fee is adjusted from what the sliding scale would indicate, a reason for the adjustment must be provided. (Valid reasons might include extraordinary medical expenses for a client suffering from HIV/AIDS, etc.)

PLEASE
 NOTE—The documentation for this form requires that the provider make at least three documented attempts to collect documentation from a client. Any questions on this form may be directed to the department at (____).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 36, Sec. 78.   (SB 1014)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.6.

(a) For the fiscal years prior to the 2004–05 fiscal year, and subject to the requirements of federal law, the maximum allowable rates for the Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program shall be determined by computing the median rate from available cost data by modality from the fiscal year that is two years prior to the year for which the rate is being established.

(b) (1) For the 2007–08 fiscal year, and subsequent fiscal years, and subject to the requirements of federal law, the maximum allowable rates for the Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program shall be determined by computing the median rate from the most recently completed cost reports, by specific service codes that are consistent with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
 Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg).

(2) For the 2005–06 and 2006–07 fiscal years, if the State Department of Health Care Services determines that reasonably reliable and complete cost report data are available, the methodology specified in this subdivision shall be applied to either or both of those years. If reasonably reliable and complete cost report data are not available, the State Department of Health Care Services shall establish rates for either or both of those years based upon the usual, customary, and reasonable charge for the services to be provided, as the department may determine in its discretion. This subdivision does not modify subdivision (h) of Section 14124.24, which requires certain providers to submit performance reports.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for the 1996–97 fiscal year, the rates for nonperinatal outpatient methadone maintenance services
 shall be set at the rate established for the 1995–96 fiscal year.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the maximum allowable rate for group outpatient drug free services shall be set on a per person basis. A group shall consist of a minimum of 2 and a maximum of 12 individuals, at least one of which shall be a Medi-Cal eligible beneficiary. For groups consisting of two individuals, if one of the individuals is ineligible for Medi-Cal, the individual who is ineligible for Medi-Cal shall be receiving outpatient drug free services for a substance use disorder diagnosed by a physician.

(e) The department shall develop individual and group rates for extensive counseling for outpatient drug free treatment, based on a 50-minute individual or a 90-minute group hour, not to exceed the total rate established for subdivision (d).

(f) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of bulletins or similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2020, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of the act that added this paragraph, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall, on a semiannual basis and in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, provide a status report to the Legislature until the regulations have been adopted.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may annually establish and update the statewide maximum allowable reimbursement rates specified in this section by means of bulletins or similar instructions.

(g) Bills for services under the Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program shall be submitted no later than 12 months from the date of service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 119.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.7.

(a) The department shall amend the state plan for medical assistance under the Medicaid program pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1396n of Title 42 of the United States Code, to add targeted case management services for those pregnant and parenting adolescents and their children, targeted by the department, in those localities served on January 1, 1991, by the Adolescent Family Life Program (Article 1 (commencing with Section 124175) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), as a covered benefit under the
 Medi-Cal program. The department shall submit the amended plan for federal approval by April 1, 1991.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “targeted case management services” shall be defined as those services provided to pregnant and parenting adolescents pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 124175) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Upon federal approval for federal financial assistance, the department shall establish the standards under which targeted case management services qualify as a Medi-Cal reimbursable service, subject to the availability of funding through the budget process, and shall develop an appropriate rate of reimbursement, subject to utilization controls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 469.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.8.

The department may not utilize any information regarding whether a beneficiary’s psychiatric inpatient admission was made on a voluntary or involuntary basis for the purpose of determining eligibility for Medi-Cal claim reimbursement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 506, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2009–10 fiscal year, a 10-percent reduction shall be applied to rates for Drug Medi-Cal services developed by the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs pursuant to Section 11758.42 of the Health and Safety Code and Sections 14021.35, 14021.5, and 14021.6.

(b) For
 the 2010–11 and 2011–12 fiscal years, rates for Drug Medi-Cal services shall be the lower of the following:

(1) The rates developed by the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs pursuant to Section 11758.42 of the Health and Safety Code and Sections 14021.35, 14021.5, and 14021.6.

(2) The rates applicable in the 2009–10 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (a), adjusted for the cumulative growth in the Implicit Price Deflator for the Costs of Goods and Services to Governmental Agencies, as reported by the Department of Finance.

(c) For the 2012–13 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, rates for Drug Medi-Cal reimbursable services shall be the lower of the following:

(1) The rates developed pursuant to Sections 14021.35, 14021.51, and
 14021.6.

(2) The rates applicable in the 2009–10 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (a), adjusted for the cumulative growth in the Implicit Price Deflator for the Costs of Goods and Services to Governmental Agencies, as reported by the Department of Finance.

(d) The rate reductions applicable for the 2009–10 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be applied retroactively to July 1, 2009.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 36, Sec. 79.   (SB 1014)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

14022.

(a) This section shall be known as the “Medi-Cal Conflict of Interest Law.”

It is the intent of the Legislature that provisions be made for disclosure of the interests of providers of service in the services, facilities and organizations to which they refer Medi-Cal recipients
 so that it is possible to determine the extent to which conflicts of interests may exist because of such referrals.

(b) As used in this section, the term “referral” means (1) the referral of a recipient by a provider of service to any other provider of service; (2) the placement of a recipient by a provider of service in any facility; or (3) the obtaining, requesting, ordering or prescribing of services or supplies by a provider of service on behalf of a recipient from any other provider of service.

As used in this section, the term “immediate family” includes the spouse and children of the provider of service, the parents of the provider of service and his spouse, and the spouses of the children of the provider of service.

(c) A payment under this chapter shall not be made to a provider of service or to any facility or organization in
 which he or his immediate family has a significant beneficial interest, for services rendered in connection with any referral of a recipient, unless there is on file with the director and the Advisory Health Council a statement of the nature and extent of such interest.

(d) This section shall become operative only upon the date of which Section 1902(a)(4)(C) of the federal Social Security Act, as added by Public Law 95-559 is repealed, held invalid by a court of appeal, or otherwise made inoperative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 606.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section conditionally operative by its own provisions.   Note: Until this section is operative, see related provisions in Article 1.6, commencing with Section 14047.)
-------------------------------------------

14022.1.

Any nursing facility or any category of intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled participating in the Medi-Cal program shall supply to the department full and complete information as to the identity (a) of each person having, directly or indirectly, an ownership interest of 10 percent or more in the facility, or, who is owner, in whole or part, of any mortgage, deed of trust, note, or other obligation secured, in whole or part, by the facility, or any of the property or assets of the facility, (b) in case a facility is organized as a corporation, of each officer and director of the corporation, and (c) in
 case a facility is organized as a partnership, of each partner; and shall promptly report any changes which would affect the current accuracy of the information so required to be supplied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1329, Sec. 13.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14022.3.

Long-term health care facilities shall reveal to applicants for admission, or their designated representatives, orally and in writing and prior to admission, whether the facility participates in the Medi-Cal program, and the circumstances under which the law permits a Medi-Cal recipient to be transferred involuntarily.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 11, Sec. 19.   Effective March 6, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

14022.4.

(a) Any nursing facility or any category of intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled currently certified to participate in the Medi-Cal program may not voluntarily withdraw from the program unless all of the
 following conditions are met:

(1) The facility shall file with the department a notice of intent to withdraw from the Medi-Cal program.

(2) Except for patients to be transferred or discharged only for medical reasons, or for patients’ welfare or that of other patients, or for nonpayment for his or her stay, the facility shall not subsequently evict any Medi-Cal recipient or private pay patient residing in the facility at the time the notice of intent to withdraw from the Medi-Cal program is filed.

(3) Patients admitted to the facility on or after the date of the notice of intent to withdraw from the Medi-Cal program shall be advised orally and in writing of both the following:

(A) That the facility intends to withdraw from the Medi-Cal program.

(B) That notwithstanding Section 14124.7, the facility is not required to keep a new resident who converts from private pay to Medi-Cal.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to facilities that have filed, prior to May 1, 1987, a notice of intent to withdraw from the Medi-Cal program.

(c) The department shall notify the appropriate substate ombudsmen monthly as to which facilities have filed a notice of intent to withdraw from the Medi-Cal program. This information shall also be made available to the public and noted in facility files available in each district office.

(d) The facility may formally withdraw from the Medi-Cal program when all patients residing in the facility at the time the facility filed the notice of intent to withdraw from the Medi-Cal
 program no longer reside in the facility.

(e) If a facility that has withdrawn as a Medi-Cal provider pursuant to this section subsequently reapplies to the department to become a Medi-Cal provider, the department shall require as a condition of becoming a Medi-Cal provider that the facility enter into a five-year Medi-Cal provider contract with the department.

(f) This section shall be inoperative in the event federal law or federal or state appellate judicial decisions prohibit implementation or invalidate any part of this section.

(g) (1) This section does not apply to any facility which ceases operations entirely.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “ceases operations entirely” means not being in operation for a period of
 not less than 12 months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 198.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (f).)
-------------------------------------------

14022.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to recognize the challenges and unique dental treatment needs of the developmentally disabled population that cannot be addressed within the current structure of benefits, frequency of allowable procedures, and treatment authorization procedures for assistance programs relating to dental benefits.

(b) The department shall work in cooperation with the State Department of Developmental Services, and in consultation with the California Dental
 Association, to provide existing data directly to the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature specified in subdivision (c), by April 1, 2003, describing the characteristics of dental services received by Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are eligible to receive dental services under the Lanterman Developmental Disability Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)), who can be easily identified, including, but not limited to, the frequency of utilization of dental procedures and services, and types of dental procedures and services.

(c) The committees to whom the data shall be provided include all of the following:

(1) The Senate Committee on Health and Human Services.

(2) The Senate Budget Subcommittee Number 3 on Health, Human Services, Labor, and Veterans Affairs.

(3) The Assembly Committee on Health.

(4) The Assembly Committee on Human Services.

(5) The Assembly Budget Subcommittee Number 1 on Health and Human Services.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the information described in subdivision (b) will be used to identify possible program modifications that are more appropriate to serve the population described in subdivision (b), and that are more efficient and more effective in serving this population, while remaining cost-neutral.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 522, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14023.

(a) Any applicant for coverage under this chapter who at the time of application has any other contractual or legal entitlement to any health care service defined in Section 14053, and who willfully fails at that time to disclose the fact of such other entitlement, or falsely represents that he or she does not have such other entitlement, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any person eligible under this chapter who, subsequent to the date of application for such assistance or coverage under this chapter, acquires any other contractual or legal entitlement to any health care
 service defined in Section 14053, and willfully fails or refuses to give notice thereof to his county welfare department within 10 days of such acquisition, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Any person eligible under this chapter who has any other contractual or legal entitlement to any health care service defined in Section 14053, and who knowing that he or she must use such entitlement first, obtains any such service under Medi-Cal without first having utilized and exhausted his or her other contractual or legal entitlement thereto or therefor, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) Any applicant shall by virtue of becoming eligible under this chapter have irrevocably assigned the benefits of any contractual or legal entitlement for health care to the State Director of Health Services to the extent that the services were paid for under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1354, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

14023.7.

Any provider of service seeking payment for health care services for a person eligible for these services under this chapter shall first seek to obtain payment from any private or public health insurance coverage to which the person is entitled, where the provider is aware of this coverage and to the extent the coverage extends to these services, prior to submitting a claim to the department for the payment of any unpaid balance for these services. In the event that a claim submitted to a private or public health insurer has not been paid within 90 days of billing by the provider, a claim may be submitted to the
 department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 125.4.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

14024.

When health care services are provided to a person under this chapter who at the time the service is provided has any other contractual or legal entitlement to such services, the director shall have the right to recover from the person, corporation, or partnership who owes such entitlement, the amount which would have been paid to the person entitled thereto, or to a third party in his behalf, or the value of the service actually provided, if the person entitled thereto was entitled to services. The Attorney General may, to recover under this section, institute and prosecute legal proceedings against the person, corporation, or partnership owing such
 entitlement in the appropriate court in the name of the director.
